California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(c) The Legislature finds that it is necessary and proper to require a separation among manufacturing interests, wholesale interests, and retail interests in the production and distribution of alcoholic beverages in order to prevent suppliers from dominating local markets through vertical integration and to prevent excessive sales of alcoholic beverages produced by overly aggressive marketing techniques. The Legislature further finds that the exceptions established by this section to the general prohibition against tied interests shall be limited to their express terms so as not to undermine the general prohibition, and intends that this section be construed accordingly.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 408, Sec. 1.   (AB 780)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

25501.

No manufacturer, bottler, importer, or wholesaler of products of the brewing industry shall:

(a) Furnish, give, rent, lend, or sell, directly or indirectly, any equipment, fixtures, or supplies, other than alcoholic beverages, to any person engaged in operating, owning, or maintaining any on-sale premises where alcoholic beverages are sold for consumption on the premises. This subdivision shall not prohibit the furnishing of draft beer pumps and iceboxes to those persons who operate on a temporary basis. Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, a manufacturer, bottler, importer, or wholesaler of products of the brewing industry may furnish, give, rent, lend, or sell, directly or indirectly, paper beverage coasters less than 25 square inches in size and having a value of less than five cents ($0.05) per coaster or brand-identified acrylic table tent holders to any person engaged in operating, owning, or maintaining any on-sale premises where alcoholic beverages are sold for consumption on the premises.

(b) Directly or indirectly, hold the ownership or any interest, by stock ownership or otherwise, in any firm, corporation, partnership, or business, furnishing, supplying, or dealing in any office, store, or restaurant furnishings or equipment, other than signs for interior use or supplies authorized to be given under this division to any person engaged in operating, owning, or maintaining any on-sale premises.

(c) Notwithstanding any provision of this section, the holder of a beer and wine wholesaler’s license may manufacture, distribute, and sell any lawful product to any person engaged in operating, owning, or maintaining any on-sale premises where alcoholic beverages are sold for consumption on the premises, provided that these products are sold by the holder of the beer and wine wholesaler’s license to the on-sale licensee at a price not less than the current market price for the product.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 774, Sec. 2.3.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

25502.

(a) No manufacturer, winegrower, manufacturer’s agent, California winegrower’s agent, rectifier, distiller, bottler, importer, or wholesaler, or any officer, director, or agent of any such person, shall, except as authorized by this division:

(1) Hold the ownership, directly or indirectly, of any interest in an off-sale license.

(2) Furnish, give, or lend any money or other thing of value, directly or indirectly, to, or guarantee the repayment of any loan or the fulfillment of any financial obligation of, any person engaged in operating, owning, or maintaining any off-sale licensed premises.

(3) Own or control any interest, directly or indirectly, by stock ownership, interlocking directors, or trusteeship, in the business, furniture, fixtures, refrigeration equipment, signs, except signs for interior use mentioned in subdivision (g) of Section 25503, or lease in premises licensed with an off-sale license.

(4) Own or control any interest, directly or indirectly, by stock ownership, interlocking directors, trusteeship, or mortgage of the realty upon which an off-sale licensed premises is maintained.

 (b) Any wholesaler in counties not to exceed 15,000 population who holds both a beer and wine wholesaler’s license and an off-sale general license and who held such licenses prior to September 19, 1947, may continue to hold such licenses but may not transfer the beer and wine wholesaler’s license to another individual, individuals, partnership, corporation or other legal entity. Where the off-sale general license is transferred to an individual, individuals, partnership, corporation or other legal entity, the transfer shall be a person-to-person transfer only.

 (c) Nothing in this section prohibits any holder of a distilled spirits manufacturer’s, manufacturer’s agent’s, California winegrower’s agent, rectifier’s, or wholesaler’s license, or any officer, employee, or representative of any such licensee, from acting as a trustee for any off-sale general licensee in any bankruptcy or other proceedings for the benefit of the creditors of the off-sale general licensee.

 (d) Nothing in this section shall alter, change, or otherwise affect, retroactively or prospectively, any of the rights or privileges granted to a winegrower or brandy manufacturer by Section 23362, or by any other provision of this division.

(e) This section does not apply to an employee of a licensee referred to in subdivision (a) who is a nonadministrative and nonsupervisorial employee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1121, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

25502.2.

(a) A person employed or engaged by an authorized licensee may appear at a promotional event at the premises of an off-sale retail licensee for the purposes of providing autographs to consumers at the promotional event only under the following conditions:

(1) A purchase from the off-sale retail licensee is not required.

(2) A fee is not charged to attend the promotional event.

(3) Autographing may only be provided on consumer advertising specialities given by the authorized licensee to a consumer or on any item provided by the consumer.

(4) The promotional event does not exceed four hours in duration.

(5) There are no more than two promotional events per calendar year involving the same authorized licensee at a single premises of an off-sale retail licensee.

(6) The off-sale retail licensee may advertise the promotional event to be held at its licensed premises.

(7) An authorized licensee may advertise in advance of the promotional event only in publications of the authorized licensee, subject to the following conditions:

(A) The advertising only lists the name and address of the off-sale retail licensee, the name of the alcoholic beverage product being featured at the promotional event, and the time, date, and location of the off-sale retail licensee location where the
 promotional event is being held.

(B) The listing of the off-sale retail licensee’s name and address is the only reference to the off-sale retail licensee in the advertisement and is relatively inconspicuous in relation to the advertisement as a whole, and the advertisement does not contain any pictures or illustrations of the off-sale retail licensee’s premises or laudatory references to the off-sale retail licensee.

(8) A wholesaler does not directly or indirectly underwrite, share in, or contribute to any costs related to the promotional event, except that a beer and wine wholesaler that holds at least six distilled spirits wholesaler licenses may directly or indirectly underwrite, share in, or contribute to any costs related to a promotional event for which the wholesaler employs or engages the person providing autographs to consumers at the promotional event.

(9) The authorized licensee notifies the department in writing of the promotional event at least 30 days in advance of the promotional event.

(10) The authorized licensee maintains records necessary to establish its compliance with this section.

(b) For purposes of this section, “authorized licensee” means a manufacturer, winegrower, manufacturer’s agent, California winegrower’s agent, rectifier, importer, brandy manufacturer, brandy importer, or wholesaler.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 311, Sec. 2.   (SB 796)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

25503.

No manufacturer, winegrower, manufacturer’s agent, California winegrower’s agent, rectifier, distiller, bottler, importer, out-of-state beer manufacturer certificate holder, or wholesaler, or any officer, director, or agent of any such person, shall do any of the following:

(a) Directly or indirectly, deliver the possession of any alcoholic beverages to any on- or off-sale licensee under an agreement of consignment whereby title to the alcoholic beverages is retained by the seller or whereby the licensee receiving the alcoholic beverages has the right at any time prior to sale to relinquish possession to or return them to the original seller.

(b) Directly or indirectly, give any licensee or any person any alcoholic beverages as free goods as a part of any sale or transaction involving alcoholic beverages.

(c) Give secret rebates or make any secret concessions to any licensee or the employees or agents of any licensee, and no licensee shall request or knowingly accept from another licensee secret rebates or secret concessions.

(d) Give or furnish, directly or indirectly, to any employee of any holder of a retail on-sale or off-sale license only anything of value for the purpose or with the intent to solicit, acquire, or obtain the help or assistance of the employee to encourage or promote either the purchase or the sale of the alcoholic beverage sold or manufactured
 by the licensee giving or furnishing anything of value, and any employee who accepts or acquires anything of value contrary to the provisions of this subdivision is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(e) Willfully or knowingly discriminate, in the same trading area, either directly or indirectly, in the price of any brand of distilled spirits sold to different retail licensees purchasing under like terms and conditions.

(f) Pay, credit, or compensate a retailer or retailers for advertising, display, or distribution service in connection with the advertising and sale of alcoholic beverages.

(g) Furnish, give, lend, or rent, directly or indirectly, to any person any decorations, paintings,
 or signs, other than signs advertising their own products as permitted by Section 25611.1.

(h) Pay money, provide credit, rebate, or give or furnish anything of value for the privilege of placing or painting a sign or advertisement, floor or window display, on or in any premises selling alcoholic beverages at retail.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 532, Sec. 2.   (AB 546)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

25503.1.

(a) Anything in this division to the contrary notwithstanding, any manufacturer, winegrower, manufacturer’s agent, rectifier, distiller, bottler, importer, or wholesaler, or any officer, director, or agent of any such person is authorized:

(1) Only in connection with alcoholic beverages manufactured, produced or sold by such licensee, to install, service and set up window displays, promotional materials, and temporary floor displays holding merchandise in the premises of an off-sale retail licensee.

(2) Only in connection with alcoholic beverages manufactured, produced or sold by such licensee, to furnish, give, lend, rent or sell decorations and decorative materials, including holiday decorations, paintings and pictures, to an off-sale retail licensee for use in the windows and elsewhere in the interior of the retail premises in connection with advertising and promotional material or displays in the premises of such retailer; provided, that the advertising and promotional material shall have no intrinsic value other than as advertising and that the total original cost of all such decorations and decorative materials, including holiday decorations, paintings and pictures furnished by any licensee and in use at any one time in any one off-sale retail premise shall not exceed the amount established by rules of the department; and provided, that the licensee or any officer, director or agent of such licensee shall not directly or indirectly pay or credit the retailer for the display of such decorations or decorative materials or for any expense incidental to their operation.

(3) To furnish, give, lend, rent or sell to an off-sale retailer who sells the alcoholic beverages of such licensee, newspaper cuts, mats, or engraved blocks for use in the retailer’s advertisements relating to such alcoholic beverages. 

(b) Anything in this chapter to the contrary notwithstanding, any holder of a wholesaler’s license may manufacture, and distribute, sell, or rent any lawful product to any person engaged in operating, owning, or maintaining any retail premises where alcoholic beverages are sold; provided, however, that such products are sold or rented by the holder of the wholesaler’s license to the licensee at a price not less than the current market price for such product; and provided, further, that the manufacturer and importer of alcoholic beverages shall be controlled by the other applicable provisions of this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 215, Sec. 1.   Effective July 13, 1983.)
-------------------------------------------

25503.2.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision in this division, any winegrower, wine blender, beer manufacturer, brandy manufacturer, distilled spirits manufacturer, distilled spirits manufacturer’s agent, rectifier, distilled spirits wholesaler, and beer and wine wholesaler, or the authorized agent or agents or representative or representatives of that licensee, may perform any of the following services for off-sale retail licensees at or on the licensed premises of the off-sale retail licensee where the licensee sells alcoholic beverages with the retail licensee’s permission:

(1) Stack or arrange cases of the brand or brands of alcoholic beverages owned or
 sold by the licensee performing the service in the storeroom or warehouse where the off-sale retail licensee stores the brand or brands.

(2) Rotate the brand or brands owned or sold by the licensee performing the service on shelves and in refrigerated boxes, and rearrange bottles or packages of the brand or brands by moving the bottles or packages horizontally or vertically from shelf to shelf in the space and shelves allocated to the brand or brands. This paragraph does not permit the removal of any brand or brands of alcoholic beverages, except beer, and brands of distilled spirits in single-serve
 containers, and wine in single-serve containers, which are owned or sold by the licensee performing the service, from the storeroom or other place belonging to an off-sale retailer for the purpose of replacing alcoholic beverages on or restocking shelves or refrigerated boxes.

(3) Take an inventory of an off-sale retailer’s stock of a brand or brands of alcoholic beverages which are owned or sold by the licensee performing the service and which are in the stockroom or other place belonging to the off-sale retailer.

(4) Service the brand or brands of alcoholic beverages owned or sold by the licensee performing the service which are on shelves, fixtures, or other display pieces at the off-sale retail premises, including, but not limited to, dusting
 bottles and shelves and refrigerated boxes allocated to the brand or brands at the retail premises. The licensees authorized to render services by this section and their agents and representatives shall not price-mark individual containers of the brand of alcoholic beverages, except beer, owned or sold by the licensee performing the service, except for individual bottles and packages used on floor displays.

(5) Rotate or rearrange the brand or brands of wine or distilled spirits owned or sold by the licensee on, in, or among permanent shelves, permanent fixtures, refrigerated boxes, or floor or other displays or display pieces; stock the brand or brands onto or into floor or other displays or display pieces; and stock the brand or brands onto or into permanent shelves, permanent fixtures, or refrigerated boxes for the sole purposes of the
 introduction of new products, the resetting or rearrangement of existing products, or the setting or arranging of new stores. Incidental touching or rearrangement of the brand or brands of another licensee by a licensee performing any of the services authorized by this paragraph for the sole purpose of accessing permanent shelves, permanent fixtures, and other spaces allocated to the licensee performing the service shall not be deemed to be a violation of any provision of this division provided the other licensee’s brands are not removed from spaces allocated to that licensee. Nothing in this paragraph permits stocking permanent shelves, permanent fixtures, or refrigerated boxes for regular inventory replenishment, except beer,
 and brands of distilled spirits in single-serve containers, and wine in single-serve containers.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision in this division, any beer manufacturer or beer and wine wholesaler, or the authorized agent or agents or representative or representatives of that licensee, may perform any of the services specified in paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, of subdivision (a), with respect to beer, for on-sale retail licensees at or on the premises of the on-sale retail licensee with the retail licensee’s permission.

(c) For purposes of this section, “single-serve
 containers” means containers that have a standard of fill between 50 milliliters and 355 milliliters that is authorized for distilled spirits under Section 5.47a of Title 27 of the Code of Federal Regulations or a standard of fill between 187 milliliters and 355 milliliters that is authorized for wine under Section 4.72 of Title 27 of the Code of Federal Regulations, either individually or in multiple container packaging, and are intended to be consumed without mixing with any other substance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 271, Sec. 1.   (AB 1149)   Effective September 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

25503.3.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, any winegrower, beer manufacturer, brandy manufacturer, distilled spirits manufacturer, craft distiller, or distilled spirits manufacturer’s agent may, at parties held, or in hospitality rooms maintained, in conjunction with meetings, conventions, or combined conventions and trade shows of bona fide trade associations of retail licensees, serve and provide free of charge, food, alcoholic and nonalcoholic beverages, entertainment, and recreational activities to the retail licensees and their guests while attending those meetings, conventions, or combined conventions and trade shows. Additionally, any person specified in this section may pay a fee to the bona fide trade association for the privilege of providing food, alcoholic or nonalcoholic beverages, entertainment, or
 recreational activities, or for display booth space, as long as the fee is at the same rate charged all suppliers.

(b) Any person specified in subdivision (a) may advertise in any regular publication of a bona fide trade association the members of which are food or alcoholic beverage retailers, if that publication does not advertise on behalf of, or directly benefit, any individual retail licensee. The advertising fee paid to the bona fide trade association or its agent shall be at the same rate charged all advertisers.

(c) Any person specified in subdivision (a) may pay membership dues to a bona fide trade association as long as the dues are at the same rate charged all nonretail members of the association.

(d) A licensed beer manufacturer or a brewpub-restaurant licensee may serve, for consumption on the premises,
 beer produced by the licensed beer manufacturer or brewpub-restaurant licensee to attendees at a meeting of a bona fide beer manufacturer trade association or brewers’ guild held on the premises of a licensed beer manufacturer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 695, Sec. 7.   (SB 1164)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

25503.4.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, a winegrower, California winegrower’s agent, wine importer, or any director, partner, officer, agent, or representative of that person, may conduct or participate in, and serve wine at, an instructional event for consumers held at a retailer’s premises featuring wines produced by or for the winegrower or, imported by the wine importer, subject to the following conditions:

(1) No premium, gift, free goods, or other thing of value may be given away in connection with the instructional event by the winegrower, California winegrower’s agent, wine importer, or retailer, except as authorized by this division.

(2) No alcoholic beverages may be given away in connection with the instructional event except that minimal amounts of wine, taken from barrels or from tanks, may be supplied and provided as samples at the instructional event. A person authorized by subdivision (a) may also provide no more than three one-ounce tastes of wine per consumer at the instructional event from bottles of wine provided by the authorized person. For purposes of this section, minimal amounts of the samples or tastes provided at the instructional event do not constitute a thing of value. Following the instructional event, any unused wine provided by the authorized person shall be removed from the retailer’s premises by the authorized person.

(3) No alcoholic beverages may be sold at the instructional event,
 except that orders for the sale of wine may be accepted by the winegrower if the sales transaction is completed at the winegrower’s premises.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 25502.2, a person identified in subdivision (a) appearing at an instructional event described in subdivision (a) may, in addition to other permitted activities, provide autographs to consumers on consumer advertising specialties given by the person to a consumer or on any item provided by a consumer. No purchase of any alcoholic beverage shall be required in connection with such autographing.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, in addition to any point-of-sale advertising or other advertising items allowed under this division or under rules of the department, a winegrower, California
 winegrower’s agent, or wine importer, in advance of an instructional event for consumers being held at a retailer’s premises, may list in any advertisement for the instructional event the name, address, telephone number, email address, internet website address, and any other electronic media of the retailer, the names of the wines being featured at the instructional event, pictures, illustrations, and depictions of the retailer’s premises, personnel, and customers, and the time, date, and location of, and other information about, the instructional event, provided:

(1) The advertisement does not also contain the retail price of the wines.

(2) The listing of the retailer’s name, address, telephone number, email address, internet website address, and any other electronic
 media in the advertisement, and any pictures, illustrations, or depictions, are relatively inconspicuous in relation to the advertisement as a whole. Laudatory references to the retailer in these advertisements are not authorized. Pictures, illustrations, or depictions shall be still pictures, illustrations, or depictions only and shall not include any video. The reposting of social media posts, including posts by the retailer, is permitted provided that the reposting complies with all the requirements of this section.

(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, the name, address, telephone number, email address, internet website address, and any other electronic media of a winegrower, wine importer, or winegrower’s agent licensee, the brand names of wine being featured, and the time, date, location, and other identifying
 information of a wine promotional lecture at retail premises may be listed in advance of the event in an advertisement of the off-sale or on-sale retail licensee.

(e) Nothing in this section authorizes a winegrower, wine importer, or winegrower’s agent licensee to share in the costs, if any, of the retailer licensee’s advertisement.

(f) Nothing in this section authorizes any person to consume any alcoholic beverage on any premises licensed with an off-sale retail license.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 257, Sec. 3.   (SB 788)   Effective September 5, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

25503.5.

(a) A winegrower, beer manufacturer, or a beer and wine wholesaler may, without charge, instruct licensees and their employees, or conduct courses of instruction for licensees and their employees, on the subject of wine or beer, including, but not limited to, the history, nature, values, composition, and characteristics of wine or beer, the use of wine lists, and the methods of presenting and serving wine or beer. The winegrower, beer manufacturer, or beer and wine wholesaler may furnish wine or beer and the equipment, materials, and utensils that may be required for use in connection with the instruction or courses of instruction.

(b) A craft distiller, distilled spirits manufacturer, distilled spirits manufacturer’s agent, distilled spirits general rectifier, or
 distilled spirits general importer may, without charge, instruct licensees and their employees, or conduct courses of instruction for licensees and their employees, on the subject of distilled spirits, including, but not limited to, the history, nature, values, and characteristics of distilled spirits, and the methods of presenting and serving distilled spirits. The craft distiller, distilled spirits manufacturer, or distilled spirits manufacturer’s agent may furnish distilled spirits and the equipment, materials, and utensils that may be required for use in connection with the instruction or courses of instruction.

(c) The instruction or courses of instruction, authorized in subdivision (a) or (b), may be given at the premises of the winegrower, beer manufacturer, beer and wine wholesaler, craft distiller, distilled spirits manufacturer, distilled spirits manufacturer’s agent, distilled spirits general rectifier, distilled spirits general
 importer, or of a licensee, including an on-sale retail licensee, or elsewhere.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 695, Sec. 8.   (SB 1164)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

25503.51.

(a) A distilled spirits wholesaler, rectifier, brandy manufacturer, or craft distiller may, without charge, instruct licensees and their employees, or conduct courses of instruction for licensees and their employees, on the subject of distilled spirits, including, but not limited to, the history, nature, values, characteristics, and related terminology of distilled spirits, and the methods of handling, presenting, and serving distilled spirits. The distilled spirits
 wholesaler, rectifier, brandy manufacturer, or craft distiller may furnish distilled spirits and the equipment, materials, and utensils that may be required for use in connection with the instruction or courses of instruction.

(b) The instruction or courses of instruction, authorized
 pursuant to subdivision (a), may be given at the premises of the distilled spirits wholesaler, rectifier, brandy manufacturer, or craft distiller, or of a licensee, including an on-sale retail licensee, or elsewhere.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 178, Sec. 1.   (SB 432)   Effective September 25, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

25503.55.

(a) A beer manufacturer, a licensed beer and wine importer general, or a licensed beer and wine wholesaler may instruct consumers or conduct courses of instruction for consumers, on the subject of beer, including, but not limited to, the history, nature, values, and characteristics of beer, and the methods of presenting and serving beer. A beer manufacturer, a licensed beer and wine importer general, or a licensed beer and wine wholesaler may conduct such instructions at the premises of a retail on-sale licensee authorized to sell beer.

(b) The instruction of consumers regarding beer may include the furnishing of tastes of beer to an individual of legal drinking age. Beer tastes at any individual course of instruction shall not exceed eight ounces of beer per person, per day. The tasting portion of a course of instruction shall not exceed one hour at any individual licensed retail premises. Tastes of beer may not be served to a consumer in their original container but must be served in an individual glass or cup.

(c) All tastes of beer served to a consumer as authorized in subdivision (b) shall be served only as part of the course of instruction and shall be served to the consumer by an employee of the on-sale retail licensee.

(d) A beer manufacturer, a licensed beer and wine importer general, or a licensed beer and wine wholesaler may not hold more than six courses of instruction per calendar year at any individual on-sale retail licensed premises if the courses of instruction includes consumer tastes of beer.

(e) (1) A representative of a beer manufacturer, a licensed beer and wine importer general, or a licensed beer and wine wholesaler, except as provided in paragraph (2), must be present and authorize any tastes of beer conducted at an on-sale retail licensed premises pursuant to this section. The representative shall be responsible for paying the retailer for the tastes of beer served at any course of instruction. Such payment shall not exceed the retail price of the beer.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, a licensed beer and wine wholesaler shall not be a representative of a beer manufacturer or a licensed beer and wine importer general.

(f) No on-sale retail licensee shall require one or more courses of instruction pursuant to this section as a requirement to carry a brand or brands of any beer manufacturer, licensed beer and wine importer general, or licensed beer and wine wholesaler.

(g) No premium, gift, free goods, or other thing of value may be given away in connection with an authorized course of instruction that includes beer tastes, except as authorized by this division. Failure to comply with the provisions of this section shall be presumed to be a violation of Section 25500.

(h) A retail licensee may advertise the instructional tasting event using interior signs visible only within the establishment.

(i) (1) A beer manufacturer, a licensed beer and wine importer general, and a licensed beer and wine wholesaler shall maintain an individual record of each course of instruction involving tastes of beer for three years.

(2) Records shall include the date of the tasting, the name and address of the retail licensee, and the brand, quantity, and payment made for the beer furnished by the beer manufacturer, the licensed beer and wine importer general, or the licensed beer and wine wholesaler.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 670, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

25503.56.

(a) An authorized licensee, or a designated representative of an authorized licensee acting as an agent of the authorized licensee, may conduct, on the area specified by paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) of Section 23396.6, an instructional tasting event for consumers on the subject of wine, beer, or distilled spirits, including, but not limited to, the history, nature, values, and characteristics of wine, beer, or distilled spirits, and the methods of presenting and serving wine, beer, or distilled spirits.

(1) (A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B), the instructional tasting event may include the serving of alcoholic beverages to an attendee of legal
 drinking age. An instructional tasting event on the subject of wine or distilled spirits shall be limited to not more than three tastings per person per day. A single tasting of distilled spirits shall not exceed one-fourth of one ounce and a single tasting of wine shall not exceed one ounce. An instructional tasting event on the subject of beer shall be limited to not more than the tasting of eight ounces of beer per person per day. The wine, beer, or distilled spirits tasted shall be limited to the products that are authorized to be sold by the authorized licensee and the licenseholder under its off-sale license.

(B) A beer and wine wholesaler may conduct an instructional tasting event but shall not serve tastes of beer unless the beer and wine wholesaler also holds a beer manufacturer’s license, an out-of-state beer manufacturer’s certificate,
 or more than six distilled spirits wholesaler’s licenses.

(C) No charge of any sort shall be made for the tastings. Except for the purposes of Section 23985, the serving of tastings shall not be deemed a sale of products pursuant to this division.

(D) A person under 21 years of age shall not serve wine, beer, or distilled spirits at the instructional tasting event.

(E) All tastes shall be served by an employee of the authorized licensee, the designated representative of the authorized licensee, or by an employee of the designated representative of the authorized licensee.

(F) An authorized licensee, or a designated representative of an authorized licensee,
 shall either supply the wine or distilled spirits to be tasted during the instructional tasting event or purchase the wine or distilled spirits from the licenseholder at the original invoiced cost. An authorized licensee, or a designated representative of an authorized licensee, shall purchase beer to be tasted during the instructional tasting event from the licenseholder at the original invoiced cost.

(G) Any unused wine, beer, or distilled spirits remaining from the tasting shall be removed from the off-sale licensed premises by the authorized licensee or its designated representative.

(2) If the instructional tasting event is conducted by a designated representative of an authorized licensee, the designated representative shall not be owned, controlled, or employed directly or
 indirectly by the licenseholder on whose premises the instructional tasting event is held.

(3) An instructional tasting event shall be limited to a single type of alcoholic beverage. For purposes of this paragraph, “type of alcoholic beverage” means distilled spirits, wine, or beer.

(b) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Authorized licensee” means a winegrower, California winegrower’s agent, beer and wine importer general, beer and wine wholesaler, wine rectifier, craft distiller, distilled spirits manufacturer, distilled spirits manufacturer’s agent, distilled spirits importer general, distilled spirits rectifier, distilled spirits general rectifier, rectifier, out-of-state distilled spirits shipper’s certificate holder,
 distilled spirits wholesaler, brandy manufacturer, brandy importer, California brandy wholesaler, beer manufacturer, or an out-of-state beer manufacturer certificate holder. “Authorized licensee” shall not include an entity that solely holds a combination of a beer and wine wholesale license and an off-sale beer and wine retail license or holds those licenses solely in combination with any license not listed in this paragraph, or holds a limited off-sale retail wine license.

(2) “Licenseholder” means an off-sale retail licensee issued an instructional tasting license pursuant to Section 23396.6.

(3) “Location” means the total contiguous area encompassed by the off-sale and on-sale licenses.

(c) Notwithstanding subparagraph
 (E) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), a licenseholder may conduct an instructional tasting event that includes the serving of tastings only when an authorized licensee or its designated representative are unable to conduct an instructional tasting event previously advertised pursuant to this section and scheduled by the authorized licensee or its designated representative, provided that the licenseholder supplies the wine, beer, or distilled spirits used in the instructional tasting event and provides or pays for a person to serve the wine, beer, or distilled spirits. Instructional tasting events conducted by a licenseholder pursuant to this subdivision are subject to the provisions of this section and Section 23396.6.

(d) No more than one authorized licensee, or its designated representative, may conduct an instructional tasting event
 that includes the serving of tastes of wine, beer, or distilled spirits at any one individual licensed premises of a licenseholder per day.

(e) A licenseholder that also holds an on-sale beer and wine license, an on-sale beer and wine eating place license, or an on-sale general license shall not allow an authorized licensee, or its designated representative, to conduct an instructional tasting event on the same day and at the same location as any instructional tasting event held pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 23386, Section 25503.4, subdivision (c) of Section 25503.5, or Section 25503.55.

(f) A licenseholder shall not condition the allowance of an instructional tasting event upon the use of a particular designated representative of an authorized licensee.

(g) In addition to any point-of-sale advertising or other advertising items allowed under this division or under rules of the department, an authorized licensee or its designated representative, in their absolute discretion and with permission of the licenseholder upon whose premises the instructional tasting event will be held, may list in any advertisement to the general public for the instructional tasting event the name, address, telephone number, email address, internet website address, and any other electronic media of the licenseholder, the names of the alcoholic beverages being featured at the instructional tasting event, pictures, illustrations, and depictions of the retailer’s premises, personnel, and customers, and the time, date, and location of, and other information about, the instructional tasting event, provided that both
 of the following apply:

(1) The advertisement does not contain the retail price of the alcoholic beverages.

(2) The listing of the licenseholder’s name, address, telephone number, email address, internet website address, and any other electronic media in the
 advertisement, and any pictures, illustrations, or depictions, are relatively inconspicuous in relation to the advertisement as a whole. Laudatory references to the licenseholder in these advertisements are not authorized. Pictures, illustrations, or depictions shall be still pictures, illustrations, or depictions only and shall not include any video. The reposting of social media posts, including posts by the retailer, is permitted provided that the reposting complies with all the requirements of this section. Nothing in this section shall authorize an authorized licensee or its designated representative to share in the costs, if any, of the licenseholder.

(h) A licenseholder may advertise an instructional tasting event to the general public. The costs of this advertising shall be borne solely by the licenseholder. Advertising
 permitted by this subdivision includes flyers, newspaper ads, internet communications, and interior signage.

(i) Except as otherwise provided in this division or rules of the department, no premium, gift, free goods, or other thing of value shall be given away by an authorized licensee or its designated representative in connection with an instructional tasting event that includes tastings of an alcoholic beverage.
